Utah statutes.
53A-17a-170.   Grants for field trips to the State Capitol.

(1)  The State Board of Education may award grants to school districts and charter schools to take students on field trips to the State Capitol.

(2)  Grant money may be used to pay for transportation expenses related to a field trip to the State Capitol.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall make rules:

(a)  establishing procedures for applying for and awarding grants; and

(b)  specifying how grant money shall be allocated among school districts and charter schools.



Enacted by Chapter 381, 2013 General Session

